Hawaii statutes.
§712-1280 Place. "Place" as
used in this part means any building, structure, or place, or any separate part
or portion thereof, whether permanent or not, or the ground itself. [L 1979, c
181, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 246, §11]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next